Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.030

Refusing to summon aid for a peace officer.

(1) A person is guilty of refusing to summon aid for a peace officer if, upon request by a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, he or she unreasonably refuses or fails to summon aid for such peace officer.

(2) Refusing to summon aid for a peace officer is a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 398; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.030.]